New Jersey, session 221, A1674.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.         Any Internet website, which is operated directly or indirectly by a State government entity, that provides information on reproductive rights, shall also provide easily accessible information on adoption services and information on resources for new and single mothers and pregnant women, who wish to give birth to their children, including the information that is published on the Department of Healths Internet website, as required pursuant to subsection b. of this section. b.    The Commissioner of Health, in consultation with the Commissioner of Banking and Insurance, the Commissioner of Human Services, the Commissioner of Children and Families, and the State Treasurer, shall develop and publish on the Department of Healths Internet website, comprehensive information on adoption services and resources for new and single mothers and pregnant women who wish to give birth to their children, which shall include, but shall not be limited to: (1)   information on the benefits of choosing adoption and information on, and links to, adoption services; and (2)   information on, and links to, resources, financial and otherwise, for new and single mothers and pregnant women who wish to give birth to their children. c.     The information provided on or through the Internet website established pursuant to subsection b. of this section may be made available in such additional languages as deemed appropriate by the Commissioner of Health. 2.    This act shall take effect 180 days following the date of enactment.